Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 6 Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act

7-6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

“Articles of incorporation” means the original or restated articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation and all amendments to it, including articles of merger and special acts of the general assembly creating corporations and/or entities.

“Authorized representative” means a person who is duly authorized by a nonprofit corporation’s board of directors to act on behalf of the nonprofit corporation.

“Board of directors” means the group of persons vested with the management of the affairs of the corporation (including, without being limited to, a board of trustees) regardless of the name by which the group is designated.

“Bylaws” means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation regardless of the name, or names, by which the rules are designated.

“Corporation” or “Domestic corporation” means a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter, except a foreign corporation.

“Delivering/Delivered” means either physically transferring a paper document to the secretary of state or transferring a document to the secretary of state by electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Director” means a member of a board of directors.

“Electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.

“Entity” includes a domestic or foreign business corporation, domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, domestic or foreign unincorporated entity, estate, trust, state, the United States, a foreign government, or a governmental subdivision.

“Filing” means delivered to the secretary of state in either paper format or electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Foreign corporation” means a nonprofit corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state.

“Insolvent” means inability of a corporation to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its affairs.

“Member” means one having membership rights in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws regardless of the name by which the person is designated.

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation of which no part of the income or profit is distributable to its members, directors, or officers, except as otherwise expressly permitted by this chapter.

“Signature” or “signed” or “executed” means an original signature, facsimile, or an electronically transmitted signature submitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Unincorporated entity” means an organization or artificial legal person that either has a separate legal existence or has the power to acquire an estate in real property in its own name and that is not any of the following: a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation, an estate, a trust, a governmental subdivision, a state, the United States, or a foreign government. The term includes a general partnership, limited-liability company, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, joint stock association, and unincorporated nonprofit association.

“Volunteer” means an individual performing services for a nonprofit corporation without compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 57, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 123, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-3.
Corporations to which this chapter applies.

The provisions of this chapter relating to domestic corporations apply to:

All corporations organized under these provisions;

All corporations previously organized under any act hereby or previously repealed for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under this chapter; and

All corporations previously or subsequently created by any special act of the general assembly for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under this chapter, except insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any special act.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the amendment of articles of incorporation of domestic corporations apply to all corporations previously or subsequently created by special act of the general assembly whose charters are subject to amendment, repeal, or modification at the pleasure of the general assembly.

The provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, incorporation authorized by an act entitled “An Act to Incorporate the Bishop and Vicar General of the Diocese of Hartford, Together with the Pastor and Two Laymen of any Roman Catholic Church or Congregation in Rhode Island” passed at the January session, 1869, and any acts in amendment of it or in addition to it may be continued to be made under it and nothing in this chapter or in the general corporation law contained is to be construed as repealing the acts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-4.
Purposes.

Corporations may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose or purposes subject to the condition that no part of the net income or profit of any corporation will be distributable to its members, directors, or officers. Subject to that condition, the purpose or purposes for which corporations may be organized under this chapter include, but are not limited to, any one or more of the following purposes or activities:

Charitable; benevolent; eleemosynary; educational; civic; patriotic; political; religious; social; recreational; fraternal; literary; cultural; athletic; scientific; agricultural; horticultural; animal husbandry; health services; and professional, commercial, industrial, or trade association;

Libraries; and fire engine companies;

Constructing, acquiring, leasing, fostering, encouraging, and assisting the physical location, settlement, or resettlement of industrial, manufacturing, commercial, or recreational facilities or enterprises within the state;

Planning, constructing, erecting, maintaining, operating, and managing land, buildings, and improvements in projects undertaken pursuant to chapters 31 — 33 of title 45;

Engaging in municipal projects authorized by the governing body of the municipality; and

Providing housing and related facilities and services for elderly persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-5.
General powers.

Each corporation has power to:

Have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation;

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal that may be altered at pleasure, and to use that seal by causing it, or a facsimile of it, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced;

Purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise, or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest in real or personal property, wherever situated, and without restriction as to amount;

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets;

Lend money to and use its credit to assist its employees (other than employees who are also directors) and otherwise assist its employees;

Purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, associations, partnerships, or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States, or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality, or of any instrumentality of those entities;

Make contracts and guarantees and incur liabilities; borrow money at the rates of interest that the corporation determines; issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations; guarantee debts and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises, and income;

Lend money for its corporate purposes; invest and reinvest its funds; and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payments of funds loaned or invested in that manner;

Conduct its affairs, carry on its operations, have offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or without this state;

Elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, who may be directors or members, and define their duties and fix their compensation;

Make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation;

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

Pay pensions and establish pension plans or pension trusts for any or all of its directors, officers, and employees;

Have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-6.
Indemnification.

As used in this section:

“Corporation” includes:

Any corporation whether foreign or domestic, and whether a nonprofit or a for-profit corporation all of the profits of which go to a nonprofit corporation; and

Any domestic or foreign predecessory entity of the corporation in a merger, consolidation, or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

“Director” means any person who is or was a director of the corporation and any person who, while a director of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, or employee benefit plan.

“Expenses” include attorneys’ fees.

“Official capacity” means:

When used with respect to a director, the office of director in the corporation.

When used with respect to a person other than a director, as contemplated in subsection (i), the elective or appointive office in the corporation held by the officer or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation, but in each case does not include service for any other foreign or domestic corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, or employee benefit plan.

“Party” includes a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made, a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative.

A corporation has power to indemnify any person made a party to any proceeding by reason of the fact that the person is or was a director if:

He or she conducted himself or herself in good faith; and

He or she reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in his or her official capacity with the corporation, that his or her conduct was in its best interests; and

In all other cases, that his or her conduct was at least not opposed to its best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he or she had no reasonable cause to believe his or her conduct was unlawful.

Indemnification may be made against judgments, penalties, fines, settlements, and reasonable expenses actually incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding; except that if the proceeding was by or in the right of the corporation, indemnification may be made only against the reasonable expenses and shall not be made in respect of any proceeding in which the person has been adjudged to be liable to the corporation. The termination of any proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, is not, of itself, determinative that the person did not meet the requisite standard of conduct set forth in this subsection.

A director is not indemnified under subsection (b) in respect of any proceeding charging improper personal benefit to him or her, whether or not involving action in his or her official capacity, in which he or she has been adjudged to be liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by him or her.

Unless limited by the articles of incorporation:

A director who is wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding referred to in subsection (b) is indemnified against reasonable expenses incurred by the director in connection with the proceeding; and

A court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application of a director and any notice that the court requires, has authority to order indemnification in the following circumstances:

If it determines a director is entitled to reimbursement under subsection (d)(1)(i), the court shall order indemnification, in which case the director is also entitled to recover the expenses of securing the reimbursement; or

If it determines that the director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director has met the standard of conduct described in subsection (b) or has been adjudged liable in the circumstances described in subsection (c), the court may order any indemnification that it deems proper, except that indemnification with respect to any proceeding by or in the right of the corporation or in which liability has been adjudged in the circumstances described in subsection (c) is limited to expenses.

A court of appropriate jurisdiction may be the same court in which the proceeding involving the director’s liability took place.

No indemnification under subsection (b) shall be made by the corporation unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because the director has met the standard of conduct described in subsection (b). The determination shall be made:

By the board of directors by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

If a quorum cannot be obtained, then by a majority vote of a committee of the board, duly designated to act in the matter by a majority vote of the full board (in which designation directors who are parties may participate), consisting solely of two (2) or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

By special legal counsel, selected by the board of directors or a committee of the board by vote as described in subsection (e)(1)(i) or (e)(1)(ii), or, if the requisite quorum of the full board cannot be obtained for the vote and the committee cannot be established, by a majority vote of the full board (in which selection directors who are parties may participate); or

By the members.

Authorization of indemnification and determination as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if the determination that indemnification is permissible is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and determination as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made in a manner specified in subsection (e)(1)(iii) for the selection of counsel. Directors who are parties to the proceeding shall not, as members, vote on the subject matter under this subsection (e).

Reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding may be paid or reimbursed by the corporation in advance of the final disposition of the proceedings upon receipt by the corporation of:

A written affirmation by the director of the director’s good-faith belief that the director has met the standard of conduct necessary for indemnification by the corporation as authorized in this section; and

A written undertaking by or on behalf of the director to repay the amount if it is ultimately determined that the director has not met the standard of conduct, and after a determination that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section. The undertaking required by this subsection (f)(2) is an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment. Determinations and authorizations of payments under this subsection (f) shall be made in the manner specified in subsection (e).

The indemnification provided by this section is not deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification are entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of members or disinterested directors, or otherwise, both as to action in his or her official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding office, and continues as to a person who ceases to be a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent and inures to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of the person. Nothing contained in this section limits the corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with his or her appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he or she has not been named a defendant or respondent in the proceeding.

For purposes of this section, the corporation is deemed to have requested a director to service an employee benefit plan whenever the performance by the director of the director’s duties to the corporation also imposes duties on, or otherwise involves services by, the director to the plan or participants or beneficiaries of the plan; excise taxes assessed on a director regarding an employee benefit plan pursuant to applicable law are deemed “fines”; and action taken or omitted by the director regarding an employee benefit plan in the performance of the director’s duties for a purpose reasonably believed by the director to be in the interest of the participants and beneficiaries of the plan are deemed to be for a purpose that is not opposed to the best interests of the corporation.

Unless limited by the articles of incorporation:

An officer of the corporation is indemnified to the same extent provided in subsection (d) for a director and is entitled to the same extent as a director to seek indemnification pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d);

A corporation has the power to indemnify and to advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation to the same extent that it may indemnify and advance expenses to directors pursuant to this section; and

A corporation, in addition, has the power to indemnify and to advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent who is not a director to any further extent, consistent with law, that is provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

A corporation has power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, other enterprise, or employee benefit plan, against any liability asserted against the director and incurred by the director in any capacity or arising out of the director’s status as director, whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify the director against liability under the provisions of this section.

Any indemnification of, or advance of expenses to, a director in accordance with this section, if arising out of a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, shall be reported, in writing, to the members with or before the notice of the next members’ meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1.

7-6-7.
Guarantee authorized by members.

Each corporation has the power to make guarantees, although not in furtherance of its corporate purposes, when authorized at a meeting of members by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members entitled to vote on the guarantees, or a greater percentage that may be provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or if there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on the guarantees, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors in office, or a greater percentage that is provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws. If authorized by a like vote, a corporation has the power to mortgage, pledge, or give a security interest in all or any of its property, franchises, and income to secure the guarantee or to secure obligations other than its own.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-8.
Limiting powers of certain corporations.

No corporation that is a “private foundation” as defined in § 509(a) (26 U.S.C. § 509(a)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 shall:

Engage in any act of “self-dealing”, as defined in § 4941(d) (26 U.S.C. § 4941(d)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4941(a) (26 U.S.C. § 4941(a)) of the code;

Retain any “excess business holdings”, as defined in § 4943(c) (26 U.S.C. § 4943(c)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4943(a) (26 U.S.C. § 4943(a)) of the code;

Make any investment which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of § 4944 (26 U.S.C. § 4944) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4944(a) (26 U.S.C. § 4944(a)) of the code; and

Make any “taxable expenditures”, as defined in § 4945(d) (26 U.S.C. § 4945(d)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4945(a) (26 U.S.C. § 4945(a)) of the code.

Each corporation which is a “private foundation” as defined in § 509(a) (26 U.S.C. § 509(a)) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 shall distribute for the purposes specified in articles of organization for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by § 4942(a) (26 U.S.C. § 4942(a)) of the code.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to any corporation to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the application would be contrary to the terms of the articles of organization or other instrument governing the corporation or governing the administration of charitable funds held by it and that the articles of incorporation may not properly be changed to conform to the sections.

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 include future amendments to the sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-9.
Exemption from liability.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter:

No person serving without compensation as a volunteer, director, officer, or trustee of a nonprofit corporation, including a corporation qualified as a tax-exempt corporation under § 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c), or of an unincorporated nonprofit organization or an unincorporated public charitable institution qualified as a tax-exempt organization under § 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, is liable to any person based solely on his or her conduct in the execution of the office or duty unless the conduct of the director, officer, trustee, or volunteer regarding the person asserting the liability constituted malicious, willful, or wanton misconduct. As used in this section, “compensation” does not include a per diem or per meeting allowance, health insurance benefits, or reimbursement for out of pocket costs and expenses incurred in the service. Nothing in these provisions is construed to exempt a volunteer from liability based upon his or her ownership and/or operation of a motor vehicle.

Officers, directors, agents, servants, volunteers, and employees of a corporation are not liable for bodily injury to any person incurred while the person is practicing for, or participating in, any contest or exhibition of an athletic or sports nature sponsored by the corporation; provided, that the person has, or in the case of a minor, a parent or guardian of the minor has, signed a written waiver of liability of the corporation and acknowledgment of assumption of risk regarding the practicing for, or participating in, any contest or exhibition of an athletic or sports nature sponsored by the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 380, § 1.

7-6-10.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act of a corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation shall be invalid because the corporation was without capacity or power to do the act or to make or receive the conveyance or transfer, but the lack of capacity or power may be asserted:

In a proceeding by a member or a director against the corporation to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized acts, or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the unauthorized acts or transfer sought to be enjoined are being, or are to be, performed pursuant to any contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if all of the parties to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if it deems it to be equitable, set aside and enjoin the performance of the contract, and in doing so may allow to the corporation or the other parties to the contract compensation for the loss or damage sustained by either of them that results from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of the contract, but anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract are not to be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained.

In a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, or through members in a representative suit, against the officers or directors of the corporation for exceeding their authority.

In a proceeding by the secretary of state, as provided in this chapter, to revoke the certificate of incorporation of the corporation, or in a proceeding by the secretary of state to enjoin the corporation from performing unauthorized acts, or in any other proceeding by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-11.
Corporate name.

The corporate name:

Shall not contain any word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in its articles of incorporation.

Shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:

The name of any corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, limited partnership, or domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified or authorized to do business or conduct affairs in this state; or

Any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title, or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision shall not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation, or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from that date.

Shall be translated into letters of the English alphabet, if it is not in English.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

Any nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in this state, may transact its affairs in this state under a fictitious name if it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this subsection (b).

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the secretary of state accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), and shall be executed by an authorized person of the nonprofit corporation or by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of the organization of the nonprofit corporation and shall describe:

The fictitious business name to be used; and

The name of the nonprofit corporation, the state or other jurisdiction in which the nonprofit corporation is organized, and date of the nonprofit corporation’s organization.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this subsection (b) or upon the dissolution of the domestic corporation or the cancellation of registration of the foreign corporation.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this subsection (b) shall be filed with the secretary of state; shall be executed in the same manner as provided in subsection (b)(2); and shall describe:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed; and

The information described in subsection (b)(2)(ii).

No domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation conducting its affairs under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or because of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of the state or until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

No nonprofit corporation may conduct its affairs under a fictitious business name pursuant to this section that is not distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any corporation, limited partnership, or domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in this state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state:

A certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation, or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from that date.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 2.

7-6-11.1.
Reservation of name — Transfer of reserved name.

The exclusive right to use a specified name for a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation may be reserved by:

A person who intends to organize a domestic nonprofit corporation;

A domestic nonprofit corporation or foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state that, in either case, proposes to change its name;

A foreign nonprofit corporation that intends to make applications for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state; or

Any person intending to organize a foreign nonprofit corporation and intending to have it registered in this state and adopt that name.

A person may reserve a specified name by filing a signed application with the secretary of state accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) and, if the secretary of state finds that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for one hundred twenty (120) days for the exclusive use of the applicant.

The exclusive right to use a reserved name may be transferred to another person by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer, specifying the name and address of the transferee and signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 3.

7-6-12.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office, which may be the same as its principal office;

A registered agent, who may be either an individual resident in this state whose business office is identical with the registered office, or a domestic corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, or a foreign corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this state, having an office identical with the registered office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-13.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the secretary of state a statement stating:

The name of the corporation;

The address of its then-registered office;

If the address of its registered office is changed, the address to which the registered office is to be changed;

The name of its then-registered agent;

If its registered agent is changed, the name of its successor registered agent;

That the address of its registered office and the address of the office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical;

That the change was authorized by a duly adopted resolution by its board of directors.

The statement shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice president and delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the statement conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the statement in the secretary of state’s office, and upon filing, the change of address of the registered office, or the appointment of a new registered agent, or both, becomes effective.

Any registered agent of a corporation may resign as the agent upon filing a written notice of resignation, executed in duplicate, with the secretary of state, who shall immediately mail a copy of it to the corporation in care of an officer, who is not the resigning registered agent, at the address of the officer as shown by the most recent annual report of the corporation. The appointment of the agent terminates upon the expiration of thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice by the secretary of state.

If a registered agent changes his, her, or its business address to another place within the state, the registered agent may change the address and the address of the registered office of any corporations of which the registered agent is registered agent by filing a statement as required in this section except that it need be signed only by the registered agent and need not be responsive to subsection (a)(5) or (a)(7) and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to each corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-14.
Service of process on corporation.

The registered agent appointed by a corporation shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

Whenever a corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, the secretary of state shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the secretary of state of any process, notice, or demand is made by delivering to and leaving with the secretary of state or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of the secretary of state’s office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately forward one of the copies by registered mail, addressed to the corporation at its registered office. Any service upon the secretary of state is returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon the secretary of state under this section, and shall record in the record the time of service and his or her action with reference to it.

Nothing contained in these provisions limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner now or subsequently permitted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-15.
Members.

A corporation may have one or more classes of members or may have no members. If the corporation has one or more classes of members, the designation of the class or classes; the manner of election or appointment; and the qualifications and rights of the members of each class shall be stated in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. If the corporation has no members, that fact shall be stated in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership. The directors, officers, employees, and members of the corporation are not liable on its obligations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.